en: Legume-based drinks, Legume milks, Legume drinks
ca: Begudes de llegums
de: Hülsenfruchtmilch, Hülsenfruchtgetränke
es: Leches de leguminosas, Bebidas de leguminosas
fi: palkokasvijuomat
fr: Boissons végétales de légumineuses, Laits de légumineuses
hr: Pića na bazi mahunarki
it: Latte di legumi
nl: Bonendranken
pl: Mleka ze strączków
pt: Leites de legumes

en: Soy-based drinks, Soy milks, Soya milks, Soya drinks, Soy drinks
bg: Соево мляко
ca: Beguda de soja
da: sojadrikke, sojamælk
de: Sojamilch, Sojamilche, Sojamilchen, Soja-Drinks, Soja-Drink, Sojadrink, Sojadrinks
es: Bebidas de soja, bebida de soya, Leches de soja
fi: soijajuomat
fr: Boissons végétales de soja, Laits de soja, Lait de soja, Boissons au soja
hr: Pića na bazi soje
hu: Szójatejek
it: Bevanda di soia
ja: 豆乳
lt: Sojų pienas
nl: Sojadranken
pl: Mleka sojowe, Napoje sojowe
pt: Bebidas de soja
ru: Соевое молоко
sv: Sojadrycker, sojadryck

en: Unsweetened plain soy-based drinks, Unsweetened natural soy milks, Unsweetened natural soy drinks
ca: Beguda de soja sense edulcorar
de: Ungesüßte natürliche Sojamilch, Ungesüßte natürliche Sojagetränke
es: Bebidas de soja natural sin azúcar, Leches de soja natural sin azúcar
fi: makeuttamattomat soijajuomat
fr: Boissons de soja nature non sucrées, Boissons végétales de soja nature, Laits de soja nature sans sucre
hr: Nezaslađena obična pića na bazi soje
it: Latte di soia naturale non zuccherato
nl: Ongezoete sojadranken
pt: Leites de soja natural não açucarados

en: Sweetened plain soy-based drinks, Sweetened natural soy milks, Sweetened natural soy drinks
de: Gesüßte natürliche Sojamilch, gesüßte natürliche Sojagetränke
es: Bebidas de soja natural endulzadas, Leches de soja natural endulzadas
fr: Boissons de soja nature sucrées, Laits de soja naturel avec du sucre
hr: Zaslađena obična pića na bazi soje
nl: Gezoete sojadranken
pt: Leites de soja natural açucarados

en: Vanilla soy-based drinks, Vanilla soy milks, Vanilla soy drinks
de: Vanille-Soja-Milch, Vanille-Soja-Getränke
es: Bebidas de soja con vainilla, Leches de soja con vainilla
fi: Vaniljan makuiset soijajuomat
fr: Boissons végétales de soja à la vanille, Laits de soja à la vanille
hr: Pića na bazi vanilije soje
it: Latti di soia alla vaniglia
nl: Vanillesojadranken
pt: Bebidas de soja com baunilha

en: Chocolate soy-based drinks, Chocolate soy milks, Cocoa soy milks, Cocoa soy drinks, Chocolate soy drinks
da: chokoladesojamælk
de: Schokoladensojamilch
es: Bebidas de soja con cacao, Bebidas de soja con chocolate, Leches de soja con cacao, Leches de soja con chocolate
fi: Soijakaakaot
fr: Boissons végétales de soja au chocolat, Boissons végétales de soja au cacao, Laits de soja au cacao, Laits de soja au chocolat
hr: Čokoladna pića na bazi soje
it: Latte di soia al cioccolato
nl: Chocosojadranken
pt: Bebidas de soja com cacau

en: Coffee soy-based drinks, Coffee soy milks, Coffee soy drinks
es: Bebidas de soja con café, Leches de soja con café
fr: Boissons végétales de soja avec du café, Laits de soja avec du café
hr: Kava pića na bazi soje
nl: Koffiesojadranken
pt: Bebidas de soja com café

en: Soy drinks flavoured with sugar
fr: Boissons au soja aromatisées sucrées

en: Plain soy drink fortified with calcium
fr: Boisson au soja nature enrichie en calcium

en: Flavoured soy drinks enriched in calcium with sugar, Flavoured soy drinks enriched in calcium with fruit concentrate
fr: Boissons au soja aromatisées sucrées enrichies en calcium

en: Black soy drinks, Black soy milks
de: Schwarze Sojabohnen Getränken
fr: Boissons au Soja Noir

en: Mixed plant milks, Mixed plant drinks
es: Mezclas de leches vegetales, Mezclas de bebidas vegetales
fr: Boissons multivégétaux
hr: Miješana biljna mlijeka
it: Latte vegetale misto
nl: Gemengde plantaardige dranken
pt: Leites de mistura de plantas

en: Nut-based drinks, Nut milks, Nut drinks
bg: Ядкови млека, ядково мляко
ca: Beguda de fruits secs
da: nødemælk
de: Nussmilch, Nussmilche, Nussmilchen, Nuss-Drinks, Nuss-Drink, Nussdrink, Nussdrinks
es: Leches de frutos de cáscara, Bebidas de frutos de cáscara, Bebidas de frutos secos, Leches de frutos secos
fi: pähkinäjuomat
fr: Boissons végétales de fruits à coque, Laits de fruits à coques
he: חלב אגוזים, משקאות אגוזים
hr: Pića na bazi orašastih plodova
hu: Dió tejek
it: Latte di semi oleosi
lt: Riešutų pienas
nl: Notendranken
pl: Mleka z orzechów, Napoje z orzechów
pt: Leites de frutos secos
ru: Ореховое молоко

en: Almond-based drinks, Almond milks, Almond drinks
bg: Бадемово мляко
ca: Beguda d'ametlla
da: mandelmælk
de: Mandelmilch, Mandelmilche, Mandelmilchen, Mandel-Drinks, Mandel-Drink, Mandeldrink, Mandeldrinks
es: Leches de almendras, Bebidas de almendras
fi: mantelijuomat
fr: Laits d'amande, lait d’amande, Boissons végétales d'amande, Boissons à l'amande
he: משקה שקדים, משקאות שקדים, חלב שקדים
hr: Pića na bazi badema
hu: Mandulatej
it: Latte di mandorla
ja: アーモンドミルク
lt: Migdolų pienas
nl: Amandeldranken
pl: Mleka migdałowe, Napoje migdałowe
pt: Bebidas de amêndoa
ru: Миндальное молоко
sv: Mandeldrycker, mandeldryck
zh: 杏仁饮料

en: Unsweetened plain almond-based drinks, Unsweetened natural almond milks
es: Leche de almendras natural sin edulcorar
fi: Makeuttamattomat luontaiset mantelijuomat
fr: Laits d'amande natures non sucrés
hr: Nezaslađena obična pića na bazi badema
pt: Leites de amêncoas naturais não açucarados

en: Sweetened plain almond-based drinks, Sweetened natural almond milks
fi: Makeutetut luontaiset mantelijuomat
fr: Laits d'amande natures sucrés
hr: Zaslađena obična pića na bazi badema

en: Chocolate almond-based drinks, Chocolate almond milks
fi: Suklaa-mantelijuomat
fr: Laits d'amande au chocolat
hr: Pića na bazi čokolade i badema

en: Vanilla almond-based drinks, Vanilla almond milks
fi: Vanilja-mantelijuomat
fr: Laits d'amande vanille
hr: Pića na bazi vanilije i badema

en: Chestnut-based drinks, Chestnut milks, Chestnut drinks
de: Kastanienmilch, Kastanienmilche, Kastanienmilchen, Kastanien-Drinks, Kastanien-Drink, Kastaniendrink, Kastaniendrinks
es: Leches de castañas, Bebidas de castañas
fr: Boissons végétales de châtaigne, Boissons végétales de châtaignes, Laits de châtaigne, Laits de châtaignes
hr: Pića na bazi kestena
lt: Kaštonų pienas
nl: Kastanjedranken

en: Coconut milks
da: Kokosmælke, Kokosmælk
de: Kokosmilch, Kokosmilche, Kokosmilchen, Kokosnussmilch, Kokosnussmilche, Kokosnussmilchen
es: Leches de coco
fr: Laits de coco, lait de coco
hr: Kokosovo mlijeko
it: Latte di cocco
sv: Kokosmjölkar